Utah statutes.
59-12-1401.   Purpose statement -- Definitions -- Scope of part.

(1)  The purpose of the tax imposed by this part is the same for cities and towns as is stated in Section 59-12-701 for counties.

(2)  The definitions of Section 59-12-702 are incorporated into this part.

(3)  This part applies only to a city or town that is located within a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class as designated in Section 17-50-501.

